02_Morphology/grn.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%>                   ! Frontera de morfema
%<n%>                ! Nombre
%<gen%>              ! Genitivo
%<loc%>              ! Locativo
%<der_kue%>          ! Pasado Nominal
%<comp%>             ! Compuesto

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON N

%<n%>: CASE ;
%<n%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON SUBST

%<der_kue%>:%>kue # "weight: 1.0" ;

LEXICON CASE

%<gen%>:%>gui #; ! "de"
%<nom%>: # ; ! ""
%<gen%>:%>gui #; ! "de"
%<loc%>:%>%{m%}e # ; ! "a, en"
# ;

LEXICON Nouns

ava:ava N ; ! "raza, gente"
óga:óga N ; ! "casa"
irũ:irũ N ; ! "amigo"
apyka:apyka N ; ! "silla"
tembiasa:tembiasa N ; ! "experiencia"
tembiasakue:tembiasakue N ; ! "historia"
akãvai:akãvai N ; ! "locura"
